Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-5008
Commission;
writs of mandamus; costs.

In addition to its other powers and duties, the commission
may issue writs of mandamus compelling compliance with its orders and compelling
the Tax Commissioner to enforce its orders and may charge the party which
has not complied with the commission's orders with costs borne by the Tax
Commissioner.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 97;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 25.